Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.080

Leasing for store space in lieu of undesirable off-street parking facility.

Cities are expressly authorized to lease space which would otherwise be wasted in an off-street parking facility for store space, both for the enhancement of civic beauty and aesthetic values and for revenue which such leasing can provide.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.86.080. Prior: 1961 c 186 s 4.]